Utah statutes.
53-3-409 (Repealed 01/01/10).   Nonresident CDL -- Qualifications.
(1)  The division may issue a nonresident CDL to a resident of a foreign
jurisdiction if the United States Secretary of Transportation has determined
that the commercial motor vehicle testing and licensing standards in the
foreign jurisdiction do not meet the testing standards in 49 C.F.R., Part 383.
(2)  An applicant for a nonresident CDL shall surrender any nonresident CDL he
holds to the issuing state for cancellation.
(3)  The word "nonresident" shall be printed clearly on the face of a
nonresident CDL issued by the division.
(4)  The holder of a nonresident CDL is subject to the same rules,
regulations, and laws as a resident CDL holder.
